lt-LT: Kasetės pavarų suderinamumas: 10 greičių; 11 greičių; 12 greičių; 13 greičių; 5 greičių; 6 greičių; 7 greičių; 8 greičių; 9 greičių; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilita rýchlosti kazety: 10-rýchlostná; 11-rýchlostná; 12-rýchlostná; 13-rýchlostná; 5-rýchlostná; 6-rýchlostná; 7-rýchlostná; 8-rýchlostná; 9-rýchlostná; Iné
nb: Kompatibilitet med kassetthastighet: 10-delt; 11-delt; 12-delt; 13-delt; 5-delt; 6-delt; 7-delt; 8-delt; 9-delt; Annet
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de velocidade do cassete: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Outras
de: Kompatibilität der Kassettengeschwindigkeit: 10-fach; 11-fach; 12-fach; 13-fach; 5-fach; 6-fach; 7-fach; 8-fach; 9-fach; Sonstiges
tr: Kaset hız uyumluluğu: 10 vites; 11 vites; 12 vites; 13 vites; 5 vites; 6 vites; 7 vites; 8 vites; 9 vites; Diğer
zh-TW: 磁帶速度相容性: 10 速; 11 速; 12 速; 13 速; 5 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 9 速; 其他
fr: Vitesses de cassette compatible: 10 vitesses; 11 vitesses; 12 vitesses; 13 vitesses; 5 vitesses; 6 vitesses; 7 vitesses; 8 vitesses; 9 vitesses; Autre
vi: Khả năng tương thích tốc độ của líp: 10 tốc độ; 11 tốc độ; 12 tốc độ; 13 tốc độ; 5 tốc độ; 6 tốc độ; 7 tốc độ; 8 tốc độ; 9 tốc độ; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost brzine kasete: 10 brzina; 11 brzina; 12 brzina; 13 brzina; 5 brzina; 6 brzina; 7 brzina; 8 brzina; 9 brzina; Ostalo
nl: Cassette snelheid compatibiliteit: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Overig
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu viteza casetei: 10 viteze; 11 viteze; 12 viteze; 13 viteze; 5 viteze; 6 viteze; 7 viteze; 8 viteze; 9 viteze; Altele
ja: カセットの速度互換性: 10速; 11速; 12速; 13速; 5速; 6速; 7速; 8速; 9速; その他
zh-CN: 磁带速度适配性: 10 速; 11 速; 12 速; 13 速; 5 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 9 速; 其他
pl: Kompatybilność prędkości kasety: 10-rzędowa; 11-rzędowa; 12-rzędowa; 13-rzędowa; 5-rzędowa; 6-rzędowa; 7-rzędowa; 8-rzędowa; 9-rzędowa; Inne
cs: Kompatibilita rychlosti kazety: 10rychlostní; 11rychlostní; 12rychlostní; 13rychlostní; 5rychlostní; 6rychlostní; 7rychlostní; 8rychlostní; 9rychlostní; Jiné
da: Kompatibilitet med kassettehastighed: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместимост със скоростта на касетата: 10 скорости; 11 скорости; 12 скорости; 13 скорости; 5 скорости; 6 скорости; 7 скорости; 8 скорости; 9 скорости; Други
sl-SI: Združljivost hitrosti kasete: 10-redna; 11-redna; 12-redna; 13-redna; 5-redna; 6-redna; 7-redna; 8-redna; 9-redna; Drugo
pt-PT: Compatibilidade de velocidade da cassete: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Outro
en: Cassette speed compatibility: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Other
sv: Kompatibilitet med kassetthastighet: 10-växlad; 11-växlad; 12-växlad; 13-växlad; 5-växlad; 6-växlad; 7-växlad; 8-växlad; 9-växlad; Övrigt
fi: Kasetin nopeuksien yhteensopivuus: 10-vaihteinen; 11-vaihteinen; 12-vaihteinen; 13-vaihteinen; 5-vaihteinen; 6-vaihteinen; 7-vaihteinen; 8-vaihteinen; 9-vaihteinen; Muu
el: Συμβατότητα ταχύτητας κασέτας: 10 ταχυτήτων; 11 ταχυτήτων; 12 ταχυτήτων; 13 ταχυτήτων; 5 ταχυτήτων; 6 ταχυτήτων; 7 ταχυτήτων; 8 ταχυτήτων; 9 ταχυτήτων; Άλλο
ko: 카세트 속도 호환성: 10단; 11단; 12단; 13단; 5단; 6단; 7단; 8단; 9단; 기타
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของความเร็วเฟืองหลัง: 10 สปีด; 11 สปีด; 12 สปีด; 13 สปีด; 5 สปีด; 6 สปีด; 7 สปีด; 8 สปีด; 9 สปีด; อื่นๆ
hu: Kazetta sebességkompatibilitása: 10 sebességes; 11 sebességes; 12 sebességes; 13 sebességes; 5 sebességes; 6 sebességes; 7 sebességes; 8 sebességes; 9 sebességes; Egyéb
ru: Совместимость кассеты по количеству скоростей: 10 скоростей; 11 скоростей; 12 скоростей; 13 скоростей; 5 скоростей; 6 скоростей; 7 скоростей; 8 скоростей; 9 скоростей; Другое
es: Compatibilidad con velocidades de casete: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Otro
it: Compatibilità della velocità della cassetta: A 10 velocità; A 11 velocità; A 12 velocità; A 13 velocità; A 5 velocità; A 6 velocità; A 7 velocità; A 8 velocità; A 9 velocità; Altro